Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 26 Physicians and Surgeons

Cross references. —

As to licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

As to podiatrists, see chapter 9 of this title.

As to inapplicability of chapter 9 of this title (relative to podiatrists) to physicians and surgeons, see §

33-9-109

.

As to chiropractors, see chapter 10 of this title.

For provision declaring the practice of chiropractics not to be the practice of medicine, surgery or osteopathy, see §

33-10-117

.

As to dentists and dental hygienists, see chapter 15 of this title.

As to inapplicability of chapter 15 of this title (relating to dentists) to legally qualified medical doctors, see §

33-15-115

.

As to nurses, see chapter 21 of this title.

As to optometrists, see chapter 23 of this title.

As to exemption from regulations concerning optometrists, see §

33-23-101

.

For the Wyoming Pharmacy Act, see chapter 24 of this title.

As to physical therapists, see chapter 25 of this title.

As to eye care practitioners, see chapter 32 of this title.

As to speech pathologists and audiologists, see chapter 33 of this title.

As to exemption of physicians and surgeons from License Act for Speech Pathologists and Audiologists, see §

33-33-104

.

As to licensing of clinical laboratories and blood banks, see chapter 34 of this title.

As to hearing aid specialist licensure, see chapter 35 of this title.

As to exemption of physicians from hearing aid specialists licensing provisions, see §

33-35-106

.

For the Wyoming Emergency Medical Services Act, see chapter 36 of this title.

As to privileged communication by a licensed or certified mental health professional, see §

33-38-113

.

As to immunity from liability for volunteer health care professionals, see §

1-1-129

.

As to admission of professional personnel of other states, including physicians, when disaster conditions prevail without the normal admissions to practice as required by statutes, see §

19-13-115

.

For duties of physicians as to public health and safety generally, see title 35.

Revision of chapter. —

Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1, revised this chapter by repealing and recreating former §§

33-26-101

through 33-26-142 as present §§

33-26-101

through

33-26-511

.

Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 2, renumbered former § 33-26-143 as present §

1-1-120

.

Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 3, renumbered former §§ 33-26-144 through 33-26-152 as present §§

35-22-101

through

35-22-109

.

Former §

33-26-102

was also amended by ch. 175, § 1. This amendment was not given effect due to the 1987 revision of this chapter.

No detailed explanation of the changes made by Laws 1987, ch. 79 has been attempted, but, where appropriate, annotations to cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Constitutionality of chapter. —

This section does not violate art. 3, § 26, Wyo. Const.State v. Pitet, 69 Wyo. 478, 243 P.2d 177,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1952).

To declare unconstitutional this chapter, having to do with the medical profession and its regulation, would be a serious thing and to do so there must be ample and good reason. The objection should be grave and the conflict between it and the constitution substantial. State v. Pitet, 69 Wyo. 478, 243 P.2d 177,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1952).

This chapter, as ch. 45, Laws 1905, with the title “Board of Medical Examiners xxx,” did not violate art. 3, §§ 24 and 26, Wyo. Const., although 4 sections thereof did not refer to or mention the board of medical examiners, since they were considered germane to the general object of the law as expressed in the title. State v. Pitet, 69 Wyo. 478, 243 P.2d 177,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1952).

This chapter, as ch. 45, Laws 1905, was incorporated in the Revised Statutes of 1931, a general revision of laws held to be within the provisions of art. 3, § 24, Wyo. Const., and was validated by that incorporation in a properly revised code, even if it was unconstitutional when originally passed. State v. Pitet, 69 Wyo. 478, 243 P.2d 177,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1952).

Applied

in

Taylor v. Wyoming Bd. of Medicine, 930 P.2d 973,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of anesthetist for injuries from spinal anesthetics, 90 ALR3d 775.

Patient's right to refuse treatment allegedly necessary to sustain life, 93 ALR3d 67.

Malpractice in connection with electroshock treatment, 94 ALR3d 317.

Physician's liability for causing patient to become addicted to drugs, 16 ALR4th 999.

Applicability of doctrine of strict liability in tort to injury resulting from X-ray radiation, 16 ALR4th 1300.

Liability of doctor, psychiatrist or psychologist for failure to take steps to prevent patient's suicide, 17 ALR4th 1128.

Liability for wrongful autopsy, 18 ALR4th 858.

Physician's tort liability for unauthorized disclosure of confidential information about patient, 48 ALR4th 668.

Medical malpractice: presumption or inference from failure of hospital or doctor to produce relevant medical records, 69 ALR4th 906.

Liability of hospital, physician or other medical personnel for death or injury to mother or child caused by improper procedures during cesarean delivery, 76 ALR4th 1112.

Physician's use of patient's tissues, cells or bodily substances for medical research or economic purposes, 16 ALR5th 143.

Medical malpractice in connection with breast augmentation, reduction or reconstruction, 28 ALR5th 497.

Psychotherapist-patient privilege under federal common law, 72 ALR Fed 395.